New Jersey, session 221, A4211.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 4 of P.L.1983, c.382 (C.52:27D-25d) is amended to read as follows: 4. In addition to any other powers and duties invested in it by law or by the commissioner, the division shall: a.     Provide staff support for the work of the fire safety commission and its advisory councils; b.    Administer and enforce the "Uniform Fire Safety Act," established by P.L.1983, c.383 (C.52:27D-192 et al.); c.    mplement training and education programs for the fire service and the public; d.    Administer a fire incident reporting system; e.     Conduct research and master planning for fire safety; and f.     n conjunction with the Department of Labor and Department of Health, conduct investigations of fire incidents in which one or more firefighters suffer death or serious injury and identify those measures which may be required to prevent the future occurrence of deaths and serious injuries under similar circumstances and, in furtherance of any such investigation, the division may issue and enforce subpoenas to compel the testimony of any person who might have knowledge of any relevant matters and the production of any relevant documents.  If any investigation conducted under this subsection results in the discovery of any violation of the provisions of the "Uniform Fire Safety Act," P.L.1983, c.383 (C.52:27D-192 et al.), the division, as an enforcing agency, may issue a written notice or order pursuant to that act. Any notice or order issued by the Division of Fire Safety pursuant to this subsection may be enforced under section 19 of P.L.1983, c.383 (C.52:27D-210) as a notice or order of the commissioner. The division shall be designated as the sole fire service training academy in this State only for the purpose of applying for federal grants.  Notwithstanding this designation, training programs approved by the division may be provided by a fire service training organization pursuant to section 3 of P.L.1995, c.266 (C.52:27D-25j) and regulations promulgated by the commissioner. The division shall conduct a needs assessment, in accordance with procedures and criteria set forth by the director, prior to applying for a federal grant. (cf:  P.L.1993, c.218, s.5) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.